Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-243
Cemeteries; regulation.

A primary city may pass rules and ordinances imposing penalties and fines, not exceeding one hundred dollars, regulating, protecting and governing the cemetery, the owners of lots therein, visitors thereof, and trespassers therein. The officers of such city shall have full jurisdiction and power in the enforcement of such rules and ordinances as though they related to the city itself.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 129, XLIII, p. 138;

R.S.1913, § 4453;

C.S.1922, § 3838;

C.S.1929, § 15-241;

R.S.1943, § 15-243.